Wyoming, session 2025, SF0013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-401(a) through (c) is amended to
read:
21-3-401. Reading assessment and intervention.
(a) Each school district shall select and implement a
reading assessment and intervention program that uses an
instrument one (1) or more instruments identified by the
state superintendent under subsection (d) of this section
that screens for signs of reading difficulties, including
but not limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies,
not less than three (3) times per year in kindergarten
through grade three (3) and that implements with fidelity
an evidence based intervention program for students at‑risk
for reading failure. The program shall include instruments
identified by the state superintendent under subsection (d)
of this section that monitor and measure reading progress
and assess student reading skills and progress to provide
data that informs any intervention. The assessment and
intervention program shall be administered to all students
in kindergarten through grade three (3). The program shall
also include implementation of evidence based core
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0013
ENROLLED ACT NO. 9, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
curricula aligned to the uniform content and performance
standards and evidenced based interventions to meet the
needs of all students. The program shall be multi-tiered
and shall include evidence based interventions to
facilitate skill‑specific remediation of any reading
difficulty as early as possible.
(b) As soon as practicable after the assessment or
screening is conducted under the program established in
subsection (a) of this section, each school district shall
provide a copy of the screening results, including an
explanation of the screening results, to the parent,
guardian or other person having control of a student
showing signs of reading difficulties, including but not
limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies, or not
showing appropriate reading competence under this section.
Students not showing appropriate reading competence found
to be high‑risk for reading failure under this section shall
be placed on an individualized reading plan anytime between
the middle of the school year in kindergarten through the
end of grade three (3) to remedy the reading related
difficulty utilizing an appropriate evidence based
intervention program, which may include a group reading
plan that does not occur during literacy core instructional
time. For students under an individualized education
program (IEP) which addresses reading difficulties, the IEP
shall be deemed sufficient to meet the requirements of this
subsection and no additional plan shall be required.
(c) Each district shall annually report to the
department of education on the progress of each of its
schools toward achieving the goal of eighty-five percent
(85%) of all students reading at grade level upon
completion of the third grade. This report shall include
cohort analysis for kindergarten through grade three (3)
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0013
ENROLLED ACT NO. 9, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
for those students identified by the screening instruments
as having signs of reading difficulties, including but not
limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies. The
report shall include the percentage of students meeting or
exceeding proficiency levels for the annual reporting
period. The reporting shall also include the aggregate
number of students identified by the screening instruments
as having signs of reading difficulties, including but not
limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies, in
addition to listing the evidence based core literacy
curricula and interventions implemented in each district by
grade. This report shall include kindergarten through grade
three (3) progress toward achieving the goal of eighty-five
percent (85%) proficiency in the specific skills known to
be predictive of grade three (3) reading proficiency and
that are listed in subsection (d) of this section. This
report shall also include grade three (3) reading
proficiency shall be determined by the grade three (3)
statewide assessment administered pursuant to W.S.
21-2-304(a)(v). Each school not meeting the eighty-five
percent (85%) goal specified under this subsection shall
submit an improvement plan to the school district, and the
school district shall submit an overall improvement plan to
the department. At a minimum, each school and district
improvement plan shall outline its general strategy for
increasing reading proficiency for the next school year and
shall specifically address the evidence based program of
instruction, assessment and intervention being implemented,
and the specific training in those programs that reading
teachers have received., the student-teacher ratio, the use
of certified tutors and the use of instructional
facilitators and paraprofessionals in kindergarten through
grade three (3) trained in the delivery of the evidence
based instruction and intervention program selected by the
district.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0013
ENROLLED ACT NO. 9, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4